Illinois, session 104th, HB2897.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 901 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/901)7    Sec. 901. Collection authority. 8    (a) In general. The Department shall collect the taxes 9imposed by this Act. The Department shall collect certified 10past due child support amounts under Section 2505-650 of the 11Department of Revenue Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 12Illinois. Except as provided in subsections (b), (c), (e), 13(f), (g), and (h) of this Section, money collected pursuant to 14subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act shall be 15paid into the General Revenue Fund in the State treasury; 16money collected pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of Section 17201 of this Act shall be paid into the Personal Property Tax 18Replacement Fund, a special fund in the State Treasury; and 19money collected under Section 2505-650 of the Department of 20Revenue Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois shall 21be paid into the Child Support Enforcement Trust Fund, a 22special fund outside the State Treasury, or to the State 23Disbursement Unit established under Section 10-26 of the   HB2897- 2 -LRB104 11461 HLH 21549 b1Illinois Public Aid Code, as directed by the Department of 2Healthcare and Family Services.3    (b) Local Government Distributive Fund. Beginning August 41, 2017 and continuing through July 31, 2022, the Treasurer 5shall transfer each month from the General Revenue Fund to the 6Local Government Distributive Fund an amount equal to the sum 7of: (i) 6.06% (10% of the ratio of the 3% individual income tax 8rate prior to 2011 to the 4.95% individual income tax rate 9after July 1, 2017) of the net revenue realized from the tax 10imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 11upon individuals, trusts, and estates during the preceding 12month; (ii) 6.85% (10% of the ratio of the 4.8% corporate 13income tax rate prior to 2011 to the 7% corporate income tax 14rate after July 1, 2017) of the net revenue realized from the 15tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this 16Act upon corporations during the preceding month; and (iii) 17beginning February 1, 2022, 6.06% of the net revenue realized 18from the tax imposed by subsection (p) of Section 201 of this 19Act upon electing pass-through entities. 20    Beginning August 1, 2022 and continuing through July 31, 212023, the Treasurer shall transfer each month from the General 22Revenue Fund to the Local Government Distributive Fund an 23amount equal to the sum of: (i) 6.16% of the net revenue 24realized from the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 25Section 201 of this Act upon individuals, trusts, and estates 26during the preceding month; (ii) 6.85% of the net revenue   HB2897- 3 -LRB104 11461 HLH 21549 b1realized from the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 2Section 201 of this Act upon corporations during the preceding 3month; and (iii) 6.16% of the net revenue realized from the tax 4imposed by subsection (p) of Section 201 of this Act upon 5electing pass-through entities. 6    Beginning August 1, 2023 and continuing through June 30, 72025, the Treasurer shall transfer each month from the General 8Revenue Fund to the Local Government Distributive Fund an 9amount equal to the sum of: (i) 6.47% of the net revenue 10realized from the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 11Section 201 of this Act upon individuals, trusts, and estates 12during the preceding month; (ii) 6.85% of the net revenue 13realized from the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 14Section 201 of this Act upon corporations during the preceding 15month; and (iii) 6.47% of the net revenue realized from the tax 16imposed by subsection (p) of Section 201 of this Act upon 17electing pass-through entities. 18    Beginning July 1, 2025, the Department shall deposit 10% 19of the net revenue realized from the taxes imposed by 20subsections (a), (b), and (p) of Section 201 directly into the 21Local Government Distributive Fund as that revenue is 22realized. 23    Net revenue realized for a month shall be defined as the 24revenue from the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 25Section 201 of this Act which is deposited into the General 26Revenue Fund, the Education Assistance Fund, the Income Tax   HB2897- 4 -LRB104 11461 HLH 21549 b1Surcharge Local Government Distributive Fund, the Fund for the 2Advancement of Education, and the Commitment to Human Services 3Fund during the month minus the amount paid out of the General 4Revenue Fund in State warrants during that same month as 5refunds to taxpayers for overpayment of liability under the 6tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this 7Act.8    Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 9beginning on July 6, 2017 (the effective date of Public Act 10100-23), those amounts required under this subsection (b) to 11be transferred by the Treasurer into the Local Government 12Distributive Fund from the General Revenue Fund shall be 13directly deposited into the Local Government Distributive Fund 14as the revenue is realized from the tax imposed by subsections 15(a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act.16    (c) Deposits Into Income Tax Refund Fund.17        (1) Beginning on January 1, 1989 and thereafter, the 18    Department shall deposit a percentage of the amounts 19    collected pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(1), (2), and 20    (3) of Section 201 of this Act into a fund in the State 21    treasury known as the Income Tax Refund Fund. Beginning 22    with State fiscal year 1990 and for each fiscal year 23    thereafter, the percentage deposited into the Income Tax 24    Refund Fund during a fiscal year shall be the Annual 25    Percentage. For fiscal year 2011, the Annual Percentage 26    shall be 8.75%. For fiscal year 2012, the Annual   HB2897- 5 -LRB104 11461 HLH 21549 b1    Percentage shall be 8.75%. For fiscal year 2013, the 2    Annual Percentage shall be 9.75%. For fiscal year 2014, 3    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.5%. For fiscal year 2015, 4    the Annual Percentage shall be 10%. For fiscal year 2018, 5    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.8%. For fiscal year 2019, 6    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.7%. For fiscal year 2020, 7    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.5%. For fiscal year 2021, 8    the Annual Percentage shall be 9%. For fiscal year 2022, 9    the Annual Percentage shall be 9.25%. For fiscal year 10    2023, the Annual Percentage shall be 9.25%. For fiscal 11    year 2024, the Annual Percentage shall be 9.15%. For 12    fiscal year 2025, the Annual Percentage shall be 9.15%. 13    For all other fiscal years, the Annual Percentage shall be 14    calculated as a fraction, the numerator of which shall be 15    the amount of refunds approved for payment by the 16    Department during the preceding fiscal year as a result of 17    overpayment of tax liability under subsections (a) and 18    (b)(1), (2), and (3) of Section 201 of this Act plus the 19    amount of such refunds remaining approved but unpaid at 20    the end of the preceding fiscal year, minus the amounts 21    transferred into the Income Tax Refund Fund from the 22    Tobacco Settlement Recovery Fund, and the denominator of 23    which shall be the amounts which will be collected 24    pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(1), (2), and (3) of 25    Section 201 of this Act during the preceding fiscal year; 26    except that in State fiscal year 2002, the Annual   HB2897- 6 -LRB104 11461 HLH 21549 b1    Percentage shall in no event exceed 7.6%. The Director of 2    Revenue shall certify the Annual Percentage to the 3    Comptroller on the last business day of the fiscal year 4    immediately preceding the fiscal year for which it is to 5    be effective.6        (2) Beginning on January 1, 1989 and thereafter, the 7    Department shall deposit a percentage of the amounts 8    collected pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(6), (7), and 9    (8), (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act into a fund in 10    the State treasury known as the Income Tax Refund Fund. 11    Beginning with State fiscal year 1990 and for each fiscal 12    year thereafter, the percentage deposited into the Income 13    Tax Refund Fund during a fiscal year shall be the Annual 14    Percentage. For fiscal year 2011, the Annual Percentage 15    shall be 17.5%. For fiscal year 2012, the Annual 16    Percentage shall be 17.5%. For fiscal year 2013, the 17    Annual Percentage shall be 14%. For fiscal year 2014, the 18    Annual Percentage shall be 13.4%. For fiscal year 2015, 19    the Annual Percentage shall be 14%. For fiscal year 2018, 20    the Annual Percentage shall be 17.5%. For fiscal year 21    2019, the Annual Percentage shall be 15.5%. For fiscal 22    year 2020, the Annual Percentage shall be 14.25%. For 23    fiscal year 2021, the Annual Percentage shall be 14%. For 24    fiscal year 2022, the Annual Percentage shall be 15%. For 25    fiscal year 2023, the Annual Percentage shall be 14.5%. 26    For fiscal year 2024, the Annual Percentage shall be 14%.   HB2897- 7 -LRB104 11461 HLH 21549 b1    For fiscal year 2025, the Annual Percentage shall be 14%. 2    For all other fiscal years, the Annual Percentage shall be 3    calculated as a fraction, the numerator of which shall be 4    the amount of refunds approved for payment by the 5    Department during the preceding fiscal year as a result of 6    overpayment of tax liability under subsections (a) and 7    (b)(6), (7), and (8), (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this 8    Act plus the amount of such refunds remaining approved but 9    unpaid at the end of the preceding fiscal year, and the 10    denominator of which shall be the amounts which will be 11    collected pursuant to subsections (a) and (b)(6), (7), and 12    (8), (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act during the 13    preceding fiscal year; except that in State fiscal year 14    2002, the Annual Percentage shall in no event exceed 23%. 15    The Director of Revenue shall certify the Annual 16    Percentage to the Comptroller on the last business day of 17    the fiscal year immediately preceding the fiscal year for 18    which it is to be effective.19        (3) The Comptroller shall order transferred and the 20    Treasurer shall transfer from the Tobacco Settlement 21    Recovery Fund to the Income Tax Refund Fund (i) 22    $35,000,000 in January, 2001, (ii) $35,000,000 in January, 23    2002, and (iii) $35,000,000 in January, 2003.24    (d) Expenditures from Income Tax Refund Fund.25        (1) Beginning January 1, 1989, money in the Income Tax 26    Refund Fund shall be expended exclusively for the purpose   HB2897- 8 -LRB104 11461 HLH 21549 b1    of paying refunds resulting from overpayment of tax 2    liability under Section 201 of this Act and for making 3    transfers pursuant to this subsection (d), except that in 4    State fiscal years 2022 and 2023, moneys in the Income Tax 5    Refund Fund shall also be used to pay one-time rebate 6    payments as provided under Sections 208.5 and 212.1.7        (2) The Director shall order payment of refunds 8    resulting from overpayment of tax liability under Section 9    201 of this Act from the Income Tax Refund Fund only to the 10    extent that amounts collected pursuant to Section 201 of 11    this Act and transfers pursuant to this subsection (d) and 12    item (3) of subsection (c) have been deposited and 13    retained in the Fund.14        (3) As soon as possible after the end of each fiscal 15    year, the Director shall order transferred and the State 16    Treasurer and State Comptroller shall transfer from the 17    Income Tax Refund Fund to the Personal Property Tax 18    Replacement Fund an amount, certified by the Director to 19    the Comptroller, equal to the excess of the amount 20    collected pursuant to subsections (c) and (d) of Section 21    201 of this Act deposited into the Income Tax Refund Fund 22    during the fiscal year over the amount of refunds 23    resulting from overpayment of tax liability under 24    subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act paid 25    from the Income Tax Refund Fund during the fiscal year.26        (4) As soon as possible after the end of each fiscal   HB2897- 9 -LRB104 11461 HLH 21549 b1    year, the Director shall order transferred and the State 2    Treasurer and State Comptroller shall transfer from the 3    Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund to the Income Tax 4    Refund Fund an amount, certified by the Director to the 5    Comptroller, equal to the excess of the amount of refunds 6    resulting from overpayment of tax liability under 7    subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act paid 8    from the Income Tax Refund Fund during the fiscal year 9    over the amount collected pursuant to subsections (c) and 10    (d) of Section 201 of this Act deposited into the Income 11    Tax Refund Fund during the fiscal year.12        (4.5) As soon as possible after the end of fiscal year 13    1999 and of each fiscal year thereafter, the Director 14    shall order transferred and the State Treasurer and State 15    Comptroller shall transfer from the Income Tax Refund Fund 16    to the General Revenue Fund any surplus remaining in the 17    Income Tax Refund Fund as of the end of such fiscal year; 18    excluding for fiscal years 2000, 2001, and 2002 amounts 19    attributable to transfers under item (3) of subsection (c) 20    less refunds resulting from the earned income tax credit, 21    and excluding for fiscal year 2022 amounts attributable to 22    transfers from the General Revenue Fund authorized by 23    Public Act 102-700.24        (5) This Act shall constitute an irrevocable and 25    continuing appropriation from the Income Tax Refund Fund 26    for the purposes of (i) paying refunds upon the order of   HB2897- 10 -LRB104 11461 HLH 21549 b1    the Director in accordance with the provisions of this 2    Section and (ii) paying one-time rebate payments under 3    Sections 208.5 and 212.1.4    (e) Deposits into the Education Assistance Fund and the 5Income Tax Surcharge Local Government Distributive Fund. On 6July 1, 1991, and thereafter, of the amounts collected 7pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act, 8minus deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, the Department 9shall deposit 7.3% into the Education Assistance Fund in the 10State Treasury. Beginning July 1, 1991, and continuing through 11January 31, 1993, of the amounts collected pursuant to 12subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income 13Tax Act, minus deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, the 14Department shall deposit 3.0% into the Income Tax Surcharge 15Local Government Distributive Fund in the State Treasury. 16Beginning February 1, 1993 and continuing through June 30, 171993, of the amounts collected pursuant to subsections (a) and 18(b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income Tax Act, minus 19deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, the Department shall 20deposit 4.4% into the Income Tax Surcharge Local Government 21Distributive Fund in the State Treasury. Beginning July 1, 221993, and continuing through June 30, 1994, of the amounts 23collected under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this 24Act, minus deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, the 25Department shall deposit 1.475% into the Income Tax Surcharge 26Local Government Distributive Fund in the State Treasury.  HB2897- 11 -LRB104 11461 HLH 21549 b1    (f) Deposits into the Fund for the Advancement of 2Education. Beginning February 1, 2015, the Department shall 3deposit the following portions of the revenue realized from 4the tax imposed upon individuals, trusts, and estates by 5subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act, minus 6deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund, into the Fund for the 7Advancement of Education: 8        (1) beginning February 1, 2015, and prior to February 9    1, 2025, 1/30; and 10        (2) beginning February 1, 2025, 1/26. 11    If the rate of tax imposed by subsection (a) and (b) of 12Section 201 is reduced pursuant to Section 201.5 of this Act, 13the Department shall not make the deposits required by this 14subsection (f) on or after the effective date of the 15reduction. 16    (g) Deposits into the Commitment to Human Services Fund. 17Beginning February 1, 2015, the Department shall deposit the 18following portions of the revenue realized from the tax 19imposed upon individuals, trusts, and estates by subsections 20(a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act, minus deposits into the 21Income Tax Refund Fund, into the Commitment to Human Services 22Fund: 23        (1) beginning February 1, 2015, and prior to February 24    1, 2025, 1/30; and 25        (2) beginning February 1, 2025, 1/26. 26    If the rate of tax imposed by subsection (a) and (b) of   HB2897- 12 -LRB104 11461 HLH 21549 b1Section 201 is reduced pursuant to Section 201.5 of this Act, 2the Department shall not make the deposits required by this 3subsection (g) on or after the effective date of the 4reduction. 5    (h) Deposits into the Tax Compliance and Administration 6Fund. Beginning on the first day of the first calendar month to 7occur on or after August 26, 2014 (the effective date of Public 8Act 98-1098), each month the Department shall pay into the Tax 9Compliance and Administration Fund, to be used, subject to 10appropriation, to fund additional auditors and compliance 11personnel at the Department, an amount equal to 1/12 of 5% of 12the cash receipts collected during the preceding fiscal year 13by the Audit Bureau of the Department from the tax imposed by 14subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d) of Section 201 of this Act, 15net of deposits into the Income Tax Refund Fund made from those 16cash receipts. 17(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 18102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-700, eff. 194-19-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, 20eff. 6-30-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 22becoming law.